Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.130

License moratorium for persons in service—Rules.

(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the license of any person licensed by the director of licensing, or the boards and commissions listed in chapter 18.235 RCW, to practice a profession or engage in an occupation, if valid and in force and effect at the time the licensee entered service in the armed forces, the United States public health service commissioned corps, or the merchant marine of the United States, shall continue in full force and effect so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The director, board, or commission shall renew the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after being discharged from service with a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other license period.

(2) If requested by the licensee, the license of a spouse or registered domestic partner of a service member in the United States armed forces, including the United States public health service commissioned corps, if valid and in force and effect at the time the service member is deployed or stationed in a location outside Washington state, must be placed in inactive military spouse or registered domestic partner status so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The director, board, or commission shall return to active status the license of every such person who applies for activation within six months after returning to Washington state, upon payment of the current renewal fee and meeting the current renewal conditions of the respective license.

(3) The director, board, or commission may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2024 c 146 s 21; 2012 c 45 s 1; 1979 c 158 s 103; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.130. Prior: 1945 c 112 s 1; 1943 c 108 s 1; RRS s 10864-1.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.